Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) There is an annual permit to allow short-term rental operators to provide a complimentary prerolled useable cannabis product, not to exceed one gram of useable cannabis for each prerolled useable cannabis product, to each rental guest who is age 21 or over. The annual permit fee is $75. A single permit applies to all rental properties owned or operated by a short-term rental operator and identified in the permit application. The provision of a complimentary prerolled useable cannabis product may occur only after an operator or staff person of the short-term rental, who is present at the short-term rental property, verifies that each rental guest who will consume a prerolled useable cannabis product is age 21 or over by checking a valid form of identification of each such rental guest at the time rental guests arrive. The rental guests must be informed the rental guests are being offered a prerolled useable cannabis product and that it is unlawful to open a package containing cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis products or to consume cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis products in view of the general public or in a public place pursuant to RCW 69.50.445. The rental guests must not have notified the operator that the rental guests decline the prerolled useable cannabis product. The prerolled useable cannabis product may, when in compliance with RCW 69.50.445, be consumed on the premises of the rental property or removed and consumed off the premises of the rental property.(2) Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this section, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations as may be prescribed by the board a permit under this section.(3) For purposes of this section, "short-term rental," "operator," and "guest" have the same meanings as in RCW 64.37.010.--- END ---